Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Hospital and Nursing Home Licensure and Inspection.
A freestanding emergency facility that is owned and operated by a licensed hospital is not required to be separately licensed unless it falls within one of the classifications of “hospital” set forth in regulations promulgated by the state Board of Health.
Additionally, the establishment of a freestanding emergency facility is not subject to the issuance of a certificate of public need unless it qualifies as a “medical care facility” under §

32.1-102.1

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable George L. Barker, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-045, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (3/8/19).